Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska42-937
Immunity.

This state or a local governmental agency, or a law enforcement officer, prosecuting attorney, clerk of the court, or any state or local governmental official acting in an official capacity, is immune from civil and criminal liability for conduct arising out of the registration or enforcement of a foreign protection order or the detention or arrest of an alleged violator of a foreign protection order if the conduct was done in good faith in an effort to comply with the Uniform Interstate Enforcement of Domestic Violence Protection Orders Act.

Laws 2003, LB 148, § 95.